Montana, session 2025, SB79.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are repealed:
81-3-215. Inspection of dead animals in feedlots.
81-3-232. Penalty for noninspection of dead animal in feedlot.
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 79
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 79, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 79
INTRODUCED BY J. KASSMIER
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LIVESTOCK
AN ACT REPEALING INSPECTION REQUIREMENTS AND PENALTIES RELATED TO DEAD ANIMALS IN
FEEDLOTS; REPEALING SECTIONS 81-3-215 AND 81-3-232, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE.”